Illinois, session 104th, HB2563.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Common Interest Community Association Act 5is amended by adding Section 1-32 and by changing Section 1-35 6as follows: 7    (765 ILCS 160/1-32 new)8    Sec. 1-32. Reserve study.9    (a) As used in this Section: 10    "Major shared components or significant infrastructure" 11means structural, mechanical, electrical, and plumbing 12components of the common areas and any other components that 13are the responsibility of the association to maintain, 14restore, repair, and replace, or infrastructure, including, 15but not limited to, roads, street lighting, hardscape, 16landscape, ponds and lakes, water features, pools, and 17accessory buildings, if applicable, with a restoration or 18replacement cost exceeding $10,000, which are capital expenses 19as identified in the federal tax code and generally accepted 20accounting principles.21    "Reserve study" means an analysis of the reserves required 22for future major maintenance, repairs, and replacements of the 23common areas that:  HB2563 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1        (1) identifies each structural, mechanical, 2    electrical, and plumbing component of the common areas and 3    any other components that are the responsibility of the 4    association to maintain, repair, and replace;5        (2) states the normal useful life and the estimated 6    remaining useful life of each identified component;7        (3) states the estimated cost of maintenance, repair, 8    or replacement of each identified component; and9        (4) states the estimated annual reserve amount 10    necessary to accomplish any identified future maintenance, 11    repair, or replacement.12    (b) Any association with major shared components or 13significant infrastructure shall cause a reserve study to be 14conducted and updated in accordance with this Section.15    (c) Any association with major shared components or 16significant infrastructure that has had a reserve study 17conducted on or after January 1, 2024, shall have an updated 18reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date the 19reserve study was conducted, and at least every 5 years 20thereafter, for purposes of assessing the condition of and 21planning for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the 22common areas.23    (d) Any association with major shared components or 24significant infrastructure that has not had a reserve study 25conducted on or after January 1, 2024, shall require that a 26reserve study be conducted on or before January 1, 2028, and   HB2563 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1shall update the study every 5 years for purposes of assessing 2the condition of and planning for maintenance, repair, and 3replacement of the common areas.4    (e) The reserve study and any update to the reserve study 5shall be conducted by a qualified person, association, 6organization, or business entity that is knowledgeable about 7the major shared components or significant infrastructure that 8will be the subject of the reserve study. A qualified person, 9association, organization, or business entity is one that has 10experience and knowledge about the normal useful life, 11function, performance, condition, maintenance, repair, and 12replacement of any one or more of the major shared components 13or significant infrastructure that will be the subject of the 14reserve study, as well as the related expenses. The reserve 15study is not required to be conducted by a single person, 16association, organization, or business entity. An association 17may internally prepare a reserve study if the reserve study 18compiles information from a qualified person, association, 19organization, or business entity.20    (f) In the event of resale of any unit in the common 21interest community, a copy of the most recent reserve study, 22if any, shall be made available to any prospective purchaser 23upon request.24    (g) Any association with 15 or fewer units is exempt from 25the requirements of this Section; however, the board still 26must comply with budgeting and reserve requirements set forth   HB2563 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1in this Act or in the community instruments. 2    (765 ILCS 160/1-35)3    Sec. 1-35. Member powers, duties, and obligations. 4    (a) The provisions of this Act, the declaration, bylaws, 5other community instruments, and rules and regulations that 6relate to the use of an individual unit or the common areas 7shall be applicable to any person leasing a unit and shall be 8deemed to be incorporated in any lease executed or renewed on 9or after the effective date of this Act. Unless otherwise 10provided in the community instruments, with regard to any 11lease entered into subsequent to the effective date of this 12Act, the unit owner leasing the unit shall deliver a copy of 13the signed lease to the association or if the lease is oral, a 14memorandum of the lease, not later than the date of occupancy 15or 10 days after the lease is signed, whichever occurs first. 16    (b) If there are multiple owners of a single unit, only one 17of the multiple owners shall be eligible to serve as a member 18of the board at any one time, unless the unit owner owns 19another unit independently. 20    (c) Two-thirds of the membership may remove a board member 21as a director at a duly called special meeting.22    (d) In the event of any resale of a unit in a common 23interest community association by a member or unit owner other 24than the developer, the board shall make available for 25inspection to the prospective purchaser, upon demand, the   HB2563 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1following: 2        (1) A copy of the declaration, other instruments, and 3    any rules and regulations. 4        (2) A statement of any liens, including a statement of 5    the account of the unit setting forth the amounts of 6    unpaid assessments and other charges due and owing. 7        (3) A statement of any capital expenditures 8    anticipated by the association within the current or 9    succeeding 2 fiscal years. 10        (4) A statement of the status and amount of any 11    reserve or replacement fund and any other fund 12    specifically designated for association projects. 13        (5) A copy of the statement of financial condition of 14    the association for the last fiscal year for which such a 15    statement is available. 16        (6) A statement of the status of any pending suits or 17    judgments in which the association is a party. 18        (7) A statement setting forth what insurance coverage 19    is provided for all members or unit owners by the 20    association for common properties.21        (8) A copy of the most recent reserve study, if any. 22    The principal officer of the board or such other officer 23as is specifically designated shall furnish the above 24information within 30 days after receiving a written request 25for such information.26    A reasonable fee covering the direct out-of-pocket cost of   HB2563 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1copying and providing such information may be charged by the 2association or the board to the unit seller for providing the 3information.4(Source: P.A. 97-605, eff. 8-26-11; 97-1090, eff. 8-24-12; 598-842, eff. 1-1-15.) 6    Section 10. The Condominium Property Act is amended by 7changing Sections 18.5 and 22.1 as follows: 8    (765 ILCS 605/18.5)  (from Ch. 30, par. 318.5)9    Sec. 18.5. Master Associations. 10    (a) If the declaration, other condominium instrument, or 11other duly recorded covenants provide that any of the powers 12of the unit owners associations are to be exercised by or may 13be delegated to a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated 14association that exercises those or other powers on behalf of 15one or more condominiums, or for the benefit of the unit owners 16of one or more condominiums, such corporation or association 17shall be a master association.18    (b) There shall be included in the declaration, other 19condominium instruments, or other duly recorded covenants 20establishing the powers and duties of the master association 21the provisions set forth in subsections (c) through (h).22    In interpreting subsections (c) through (h), the courts 23should interpret these provisions so that they are interpreted 24consistently with the similar parallel provisions found in   HB2563 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1other parts of this Act.2    (c) Meetings and finances.3        (1) Each unit owner of a condominium subject to the 4    authority of the board of the master association shall 5    receive, at least 30 days prior to the adoption thereof by 6    the board of the master association, a copy of the 7    proposed annual budget.8        (2) The board of the master association shall annually 9    supply to all unit owners of condominiums subject to the 10    authority of the board of the master association an 11    itemized accounting of the common expenses for the 12    preceding year actually incurred or paid, together with a 13    tabulation of the amounts collected pursuant to the budget 14    or assessment, and showing the net excess or deficit of 15    income over expenditures plus reserves.16        (3) Each unit owner of a condominium subject to the 17    authority of the board of the master association shall 18    receive written notice mailed or delivered no less than 10 19    and no more than 30 days prior to any meeting of the board 20    of the master association concerning the adoption of the 21    proposed annual budget or any increase in the budget, or 22    establishment of an assessment.23        (4) Meetings of the board of the master association 24    shall be open to any unit owner in a condominium subject to 25    the authority of the board of the master association, 26    except for the portion of any meeting held:  HB2563 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1            (A) to discuss litigation when an action against 2        or on behalf of the particular master association has 3        been filed and is pending in a court or administrative 4        tribunal, or when the board of the master association 5        finds that such an action is probable or imminent,6            (B) to consider information regarding appointment, 7        employment or dismissal of an employee, or8            (C) to discuss violations of rules and regulations 9        of the master association or unpaid common expenses 10        owed to the master association.11    Any vote on these matters shall be taken at a meeting or 12    portion thereof open to any unit owner of a condominium 13    subject to the authority of the master association.14        Any unit owner may record the proceedings at meetings 15    required to be open by this Act by tape, film or other 16    means; the board may prescribe reasonable rules and 17    regulations to govern the right to make such recordings. 18    Notice of meetings shall be mailed or delivered at least 19    48 hours prior thereto, unless a written waiver of such 20    notice is signed by the persons entitled to notice before 21    the meeting is convened. Copies of notices of meetings of 22    the board of the master association shall be posted in 23    entranceways, elevators, or other conspicuous places in 24    the condominium at least 48 hours prior to the meeting of 25    the board of the master association. Where there is no 26    common entranceway for 7 or more units, the board of the   HB2563 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    master association may designate one or more locations in 2    the proximity of these units where the notices of meetings 3    shall be posted.4        (5) If the declaration provides for election by unit 5    owners of members of the board of directors in the event of 6    a resale of a unit in the master association, the 7    purchaser of a unit from a seller other than the developer 8    pursuant to an installment sales contract for purchase 9    shall, during such times as he or she resides in the unit, 10    be counted toward a quorum for purposes of election of 11    members of the board of directors at any meeting of the 12    unit owners called for purposes of electing members of the 13    board, and shall have the right to vote for the election of 14    members of the board of directors and to be elected to and 15    serve on the board of directors unless the seller 16    expressly retains in writing any or all of those rights. 17    In no event may the seller and purchaser both be counted 18    toward a quorum, be permitted to vote for a particular 19    office, or be elected and serve on the board. Satisfactory 20    evidence of the installment sales contract shall be made 21    available to the association or its agents. For purposes 22    of this subsection, "installment sales contract" shall 23    have the same meaning as set forth in Section 5 of the 24    Installment Sales Contract Act and subsection (e) of 25    Section 1 of the Dwelling Unit Installment Contract Act. 26        (6) The board of the master association shall have the   HB2563 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    authority to establish and maintain a system of master 2    metering of public utility services and to collect 3    payments in connection therewith, subject to the 4    requirements of the Tenant Utility Payment Disclosure Act.5        (7) The board of the master association or a common 6    interest community association shall have the power, after 7    notice and an opportunity to be heard, to levy and collect 8    reasonable fines from members for violations of the 9    declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the 10    master association or the common interest community 11    association. Nothing contained in this subdivision (7) 12    shall give rise to a statutory lien for unpaid fines.13        (8) Other than attorney's fees, no fees pertaining to 14    the collection of a unit owner's financial obligation to 15    the Association, including fees charged by a manager or 16    managing agent, shall be added to and deemed a part of an 17    owner's respective share of the common expenses unless: 18    (i) the managing agent fees relate to the costs to collect 19    common expenses for the Association; (ii) the fees are set 20    forth in a contract between the managing agent and the 21    Association; and (iii) the authority to add the management 22    fees to an owner's respective share of the common expenses 23    is specifically stated in the declaration or bylaws of the 24    Association.25    (d) Records.26        (1) The board of the master association shall maintain   HB2563 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    the following records of the association and make them 2    available for examination and copying at convenient hours 3    of weekdays by any unit owners in a condominium subject to 4    the authority of the board or their mortgagees and their 5    duly authorized agents or attorneys:6            (i) Copies of the recorded declaration, other 7        condominium instruments, other duly recorded covenants 8        and bylaws and any amendments, articles of 9        incorporation of the master association, annual 10        reports and any rules and regulations adopted by the 11        master association or its board shall be available. 12        Prior to the organization of the master association, 13        the developer shall maintain and make available the 14        records set forth in this subdivision (d)(1) for 15        examination and copying.16            (ii) Detailed and accurate records in 17        chronological order of the receipts and expenditures 18        affecting the common areas, specifying and itemizing 19        the maintenance and repair expenses of the common 20        areas and any other expenses incurred, and copies of 21        all contracts, leases, or other agreements entered 22        into by the master association, shall be maintained.23            (iii) The minutes of all meetings of the master 24        association and the board of the master association 25        shall be maintained for not less than 7 years.26            (iv) Ballots and proxies related thereto, if any,   HB2563 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1        for any election held for the board of the master 2        association and for any other matters voted on by the 3        unit owners shall be maintained for not less than one 4        year.5            (v) Such other records of the master association 6        as are available for inspection by members of a 7        not-for-profit corporation pursuant to Section 107.75 8        of the General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 1986 9        shall be maintained.10            (vi) With respect to units owned by a land trust, 11        if a trustee designates in writing a person to cast 12        votes on behalf of the unit owner, the designation 13        shall remain in effect until a subsequent document is 14        filed with the association.15        (2) Where a request for records under this subsection 16    is made in writing to the board of managers or its agent, 17    failure to provide the requested record or to respond 18    within 30 days shall be deemed a denial by the board of 19    directors.20        (3) A reasonable fee may be charged by the master 21    association or its board for the cost of copying.22        (4) If the board of directors fails to provide records 23    properly requested under subdivision (d)(1) within the 24    time period provided in subdivision (d)(2), the unit owner 25    may seek appropriate relief, including an award of 26    attorney's fees and costs.  HB2563 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    (e) The board of directors shall have standing and 2capacity to act in a representative capacity in relation to 3matters involving the common areas of the master association 4or more than one unit, on behalf of the unit owners as their 5interests may appear.6    (f) Administration of property prior to election of the 7initial board of directors.8        (1) Until the election, by the unit owners or the 9    boards of managers of the underlying condominium 10    associations, of the initial board of directors of a 11    master association whose declaration is recorded on or 12    after August 10, 1990, the same rights, titles, powers, 13    privileges, trusts, duties and obligations that are vested 14    in or imposed upon the board of directors by this Act or in 15    the declaration or other duly recorded covenant shall be 16    held and performed by the developer.17        (2) The election of the initial board of directors of 18    a master association whose declaration is recorded on or 19    after August 10, 1990, by the unit owners or the boards of 20    managers of the underlying condominium associations, shall 21    be held not later than 60 days after the conveyance by the 22    developer of 75% of the units, or 3 years after the 23    recording of the declaration, whichever is earlier. The 24    developer shall give at least 21 days notice of the 25    meeting to elect the initial board of directors and shall 26    upon request provide to any unit owner, within 3 working   HB2563 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    days of the request, the names, addresses, and weighted 2    vote of each unit owner entitled to vote at the meeting. 3    Any unit owner shall upon receipt of the request be 4    provided with the same information, within 10 days of the 5    request, with respect to each subsequent meeting to elect 6    members of the board of directors.7        (3) If the initial board of directors of a master 8    association whose declaration is recorded on or after 9    August 10, 1990 is not elected by the unit owners or the 10    members of the underlying condominium association board of 11    managers at the time established in subdivision (f)(2), 12    the developer shall continue in office for a period of 30 13    days, whereupon written notice of his resignation shall be 14    sent to all of the unit owners or members of the underlying 15    condominium board of managers entitled to vote at an 16    election for members of the board of directors.17        (4) Within 60 days following the election of a 18    majority of the board of directors, other than the 19    developer, by unit owners, the developer shall deliver to 20    the board of directors:21            (i) All original documents as recorded or filed 22        pertaining to the property, its administration, and 23        the association, such as the declaration, articles of 24        incorporation, other instruments, annual reports, 25        minutes, rules and regulations, and contracts, leases, 26        or other agreements entered into by the association.   HB2563 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1        If any original documents are unavailable, a copy may 2        be provided if certified by affidavit of the 3        developer, or an officer or agent of the developer, as 4        being a complete copy of the actual document recorded 5        or filed.6            (ii) A detailed accounting by the developer, 7        setting forth the source and nature of receipts and 8        expenditures in connection with the management, 9        maintenance and operation of the property, copies of 10        all insurance policies, and a list of any loans or 11        advances to the association which are outstanding.12            (iii) Association funds, which shall have been at 13        all times segregated from any other moneys of the 14        developer.15            (iv) A schedule of all real or personal property, 16        equipment and fixtures belonging to the association, 17        including documents transferring the property, 18        warranties, if any, for all real and personal property 19        and equipment, deeds, title insurance policies, and 20        all tax bills.21            (v) A list of all litigation, administrative 22        action and arbitrations involving the association, any 23        notices of governmental bodies involving actions taken 24        or which may be taken concerning the association, 25        engineering and architectural drawings and 26        specifications as approved by any governmental   HB2563 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1        authority, all other documents filed with any other 2        governmental authority, all governmental certificates, 3        correspondence involving enforcement of any 4        association requirements, copies of any documents 5        relating to disputes involving unit owners, and 6        originals of all documents relating to everything 7        listed in this subparagraph.8            (vi) If the developer fails to fully comply with 9        this paragraph (4) within the 60 days provided and 10        fails to fully comply within 10 days of written demand 11        mailed by registered or certified mail to his or her 12        last known address, the board may bring an action to 13        compel compliance with this paragraph (4). If the 14        court finds that any of the required deliveries were 15        not made within the required period, the board shall 16        be entitled to recover its reasonable attorneys' fees 17        and costs incurred from and after the date of 18        expiration of the 10 day demand.19        (5) With respect to any master association whose 20    declaration is recorded on or after August 10, 1990, any 21    contract, lease, or other agreement made prior to the 22    election of a majority of the board of directors other 23    than the developer by or on behalf of unit owners or 24    underlying condominium associations, the association or 25    the board of directors, which extends for a period of more 26    than 2 years from the recording of the declaration, shall   HB2563 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    be subject to cancellation by more than 1/2 of the votes of 2    the unit owners, other than the developer, cast at a 3    special meeting of members called for that purpose during 4    a period of 90 days prior to the expiration of the 2 year 5    period if the board of managers is elected by the unit 6    owners, otherwise by more than 1/2 of the underlying 7    condominium board of managers. At least 60 days prior to 8    the expiration of the 2 year period, the board of 9    directors, or, if the board is still under developer 10    control, then the board of managers or the developer shall 11    send notice to every unit owner or underlying condominium 12    board of managers, notifying them of this provision, of 13    what contracts, leases and other agreements are affected, 14    and of the procedure for calling a meeting of the unit 15    owners or for action by the underlying condominium board 16    of managers for the purpose of acting to terminate such 17    contracts, leases or other agreements. During the 90 day 18    period the other party to the contract, lease, or other 19    agreement shall also have the right of cancellation.20        (6) The statute of limitations for any actions in law 21    or equity which the master association may bring shall not 22    begin to run until the unit owners or underlying 23    condominium board of managers have elected a majority of 24    the members of the board of directors.25    (g) In the event of any resale of a unit in a master 26association by a unit owner other than the developer, the   HB2563 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1owner shall obtain from the board of directors and shall make 2available for inspection to the prospective purchaser, upon 3demand, the following:4        (1) A copy of the declaration, other instruments and 5    any rules and regulations.6        (2) A statement of any liens, including a statement of 7    the account of the unit setting forth the amounts of 8    unpaid assessments and other charges due and owing.9        (3) A statement of any capital expenditures 10    anticipated by the association within the current or 11    succeeding 2 fiscal years.12        (4) A statement of the status and amount of any 13    reserve for replacement fund and any portion of such fund 14    earmarked for any specified project by the board of 15    directors.16        (5) A copy of the statement of financial condition of 17    the association for the last fiscal year for which such a 18    statement is available.19        (6) A statement of the status of any pending suits or 20    judgments in which the association is a party.21        (7) A statement setting forth what insurance coverage 22    is provided for all unit owners by the association.23        (8) A statement that any improvements or alterations 24    made to the unit, or any part of the common areas assigned 25    thereto, by the prior unit owner are in good faith 26    believed to be in compliance with the declaration of the   HB2563 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    master association.2        (9) A copy of the most recent reserve study, if any. 3    The principal officer of the unit owner's association or 4such other officer as is specifically designated shall furnish 5the above information when requested to do so in writing, 6within 30 days of receiving the request.7    A reasonable fee covering the direct out-of-pocket cost of 8copying and providing such information may be charged by the 9association or its board of directors to the unit seller for 10providing the information.11    (g-1) The purchaser of a unit of a common interest 12community at a judicial foreclosure sale, other than a 13mortgagee, who takes possession of a unit of a common interest 14community pursuant to a court order or a purchaser who 15acquires title from a mortgagee shall have the duty to pay the 16proportionate share, if any, of the common expenses for the 17unit that would have become due in the absence of any 18assessment acceleration during the 6 months immediately 19preceding institution of an action to enforce the collection 20of assessments and the court costs incurred by the association 21in an action to enforce the collection that remain unpaid by 22the owner during whose possession the assessments accrued. If 23the outstanding assessments and the court costs incurred by 24the association in an action to enforce the collection are 25paid at any time during any action to enforce the collection of 26assessments, the purchaser shall have no obligation to pay any   HB2563 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1assessments that accrued before he or she acquired title. The 2notice of sale of a unit of a common interest community under 3subsection (c) of Section 15-1507 of the Code of Civil 4Procedure shall state that the purchaser of the unit other 5than a mortgagee shall pay the assessments and court costs 6required by this subsection (g-1). 7    (h) Errors and omissions.8        (1) If there is an omission or error in the 9    declaration or other instrument of the master association, 10    the master association may correct the error or omission 11    by an amendment to the declaration or other instrument, as 12    may be required to conform it to this Act, to any other 13    applicable statute, or to the declaration. The amendment 14    shall be adopted by vote of two-thirds of the members of 15    the board of directors or by a majority vote of the unit 16    owners at a meeting called for that purpose, unless the 17    Act or the declaration of the master association 18    specifically provides for greater percentages or different 19    procedures.20        (2) If, through a scrivener's error, a unit has not 21    been designated as owning an appropriate undivided share 22    of the common areas or does not bear an appropriate share 23    of the common expenses, or if all of the common expenses or 24    all of the common elements in the condominium have not 25    been distributed in the declaration, so that the sum total 26    of the shares of common areas which have been distributed   HB2563 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    or the sum total of the shares of the common expenses fail 2    to equal 100%, or if it appears that more than 100% of the 3    common elements or common expenses have been distributed, 4    the error may be corrected by operation of law by filing an 5    amendment to the declaration, approved by vote of 6    two-thirds of the members of the board of directors or a 7    majority vote of the unit owners at a meeting called for 8    that purpose, which proportionately adjusts all percentage 9    interests so that the total is equal to 100%, unless the 10    declaration specifically provides for a different 11    procedure or different percentage vote by the owners of 12    the units and the owners of mortgages thereon affected by 13    modification being made in the undivided interest in the 14    common areas, the number of votes in the unit owners 15    association or the liability for common expenses 16    appertaining to the unit.17        (3) If an omission or error or a scrivener's error in 18    the declaration or other instrument is corrected by vote 19    of two-thirds of the members of the board of directors 20    pursuant to the authority established in subdivisions 21    (h)(1) or (h)(2) of this Section, the board, upon written 22    petition by unit owners with 20% of the votes of the 23    association or resolutions adopted by the board of 24    managers or board of directors of the condominium and 25    common interest community associations which select 20% of 26    the members of the board of directors of the master   HB2563 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    association, whichever is applicable, received within 30 2    days of the board action, shall call a meeting of the unit 3    owners or the boards of the condominium and common 4    interest community associations which select members of 5    the board of directors of the master association within 30 6    days of the filing of the petition or receipt of the 7    condominium and common interest community association 8    resolution to consider the board action. Unless a majority 9    of the votes of the unit owners of the association are cast 10    at the meeting to reject the action, or board of managers 11    or board of directors of condominium and common interest 12    community associations which select over 50% of the 13    members of the board of the master association adopt 14    resolutions prior to the meeting rejecting the action of 15    the board of directors of the master association, it is 16    ratified whether or not a quorum is present.17        (4) The procedures for amendments set forth in this 18    subsection (h) cannot be used if such an amendment would 19    materially or adversely affect property rights of the unit 20    owners unless the affected unit owners consent in writing. 21    This Section does not restrict the powers of the 22    association to otherwise amend the declaration, bylaws, or 23    other condominium instruments, but authorizes a simple 24    process of amendment requiring a lesser vote for the 25    purpose of correcting defects, errors, or omissions when 26    the property rights of the unit owners are not materially   HB2563 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    or adversely affected.2        (5) If there is an omission or error in the 3    declaration or other instruments that may not be corrected 4    by an amendment procedure set forth in subdivision (h)(1) 5    or (h)(2) of this Section, then the circuit court in the 6    county in which the master association is located shall 7    have jurisdiction to hear a petition of one or more of the 8    unit owners thereon or of the association, to correct the 9    error or omission, and the action may be a class action. 10    The court may require that one or more methods of 11    correcting the error or omission be submitted to the unit 12    owners to determine the most acceptable correction. All 13    unit owners in the association must be joined as parties 14    to the action. Service of process on owners may be by 15    publication, but the plaintiff shall furnish all unit 16    owners not personally served with process with copies of 17    the petition and final judgment of the court by certified 18    mail, return receipt requested, at their last known 19    address.20        (6) Nothing contained in this Section shall be 21    construed to invalidate any provision of a declaration 22    authorizing the developer to amend an instrument prior to 23    the latest date on which the initial membership meeting of 24    the unit owners must be held, whether or not it has 25    actually been held, to bring the instrument into 26    compliance with the legal requirements of the Federal   HB2563 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan 2    Mortgage Corporation, the Federal Housing Administration, 3    the United States Veterans Administration or their 4    respective successors and assigns.5    (i) The provisions of subsections (c) through (h) are 6applicable to all declarations, other condominium instruments, 7and other duly recorded covenants establishing the powers and 8duties of the master association recorded under this Act. Any 9portion of a declaration, other condominium instrument, or 10other duly recorded covenant establishing the powers and 11duties of a master association which contains provisions 12contrary to the provisions of subsection (c) through (h) shall 13be void as against public policy and ineffective. Any 14declaration, other condominium instrument, or other duly 15recorded covenant establishing the powers and duties of the 16master association which fails to contain the provisions 17required by subsections (c) through (h) shall be deemed to 18incorporate such provisions by operation of law.19    (j) (Blank).20    (k) Reserve study.21        (1) As used in this Section: 22        "Major shared components or significant 23    infrastructure" means structural, mechanical, electrical, 24    and plumbing components of the common areas and any other 25    components that are the responsibility of the association 26    to maintain, restore, repair, and replace, or   HB2563 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    infrastructure, including, but not limited to, roads, 2    street lighting, hardscape, landscape, ponds and lakes, 3    water features, pools, and accessory buildings, if 4    applicable, with a restoration or replacement cost 5    exceeding $10,000, which are capital expenses as 6    identified in the federal tax code and generally accepted 7    accounting principles.8        "Reserve study" means an analysis of the reserves 9    required for future major maintenance, repairs, and 10    replacements of the common elements that:11        (2) Any association with major shared components or 12    significant infrastructure shall cause a reserve study to 13    be conducted and updated in accordance with this Section.14        (3) Any association with major shared components or 15    significant infrastructure that has had a reserve study 16    conducted on or after January 1, 2024, shall have an 17    updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the 18    date the reserve study was conducted, and at least every 5 19    years thereafter, for purposes of assessing the condition 20    of and planning for maintenance, repair, and replacement 21    of the common areas.22        (4) Any association with major shared components or 23    significant infrastructure that has not had a reserve 24    study conducted on or after January 1, 2024, shall require 25    that a reserve study be conducted on or before January 1, 26    2028, and shall update the study every 5 years for   HB2563 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    purposes of assessing the condition of and planning for 2    maintenance, repair and replacement of the common areas.3        (5) The reserve study and any update thereof shall be 4    conducted by a qualified person, association, 5    organization, or business entity who is knowledgeable 6    about the major shared components or significant 7    infrastructure that will be the subject of the reserve 8    study. A qualified person, association, organization, or 9    business entity is one who has experience and knowledge 10    about the normal useful life, function, performance, 11    condition, maintenance, repair, and replacement, and 12    related expenses, of any one or more of the major shared 13    components or significant infrastructure that will be the 14    subject of the reserve study. The reserve study is not 15    required to be conducted by a single person, association, 16    organization, or business entity. An association may 17    internally prepare a reserve study provided that such a 18    reserve study compiles information from a qualified 19    person, association, organization, or business entity.20        (6) In the event of resale of any unit in the common 21    interest community, a copy of the most recent reserve 22    study, if any, shall be made available to any prospective 23    purchaser, upon request.24        (7) Any association with 15 or fewer units is exempt 25    from the requirements of this subsection (j); however, the 26    board still must comply with budgeting and reserve   HB2563 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    requirements as provided elsewhere in the Act or in the 2    community instruments.3(Source: P.A. 100-416, eff. 1-1-18.) 4    (765 ILCS 605/22.1)  (from Ch. 30, par. 322.1)5    Sec. 22.1. (a) In the event of any resale of a condominium 6unit by a unit owner other than the developer such owner shall 7obtain from the Board of Managers and shall make available for 8inspection to the prospective purchaser, upon demand, the 9following:10        (1) A copy of the Declaration, by-laws, other 11    condominium instruments, and any rules and regulations.12        (2) A statement of any liens, including a statement of 13    the account of the unit setting forth the amounts of 14    unpaid assessments and other charges due and owing as 15    authorized and limited by the provisions of Section 9 of 16    this Act or the condominium instruments.17        (3) A statement of any capital expenditures 18    anticipated by the unit owner's association within the 19    current or succeeding 2 fiscal years.20        (4) A statement of the status and amount of any 21    reserve for replacement fund and any portion of such fund 22    earmarked for any specified project by the Board of 23    Managers.24        (5) A copy of the statement of financial condition of 25    the unit owner's association for the last fiscal year for   HB2563 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1    which such statement is available.2        (6) A statement of the status of any pending suits or 3    judgments in which the unit owner's association is a 4    party.5        (7) A statement setting forth what insurance coverage 6    is provided for all unit owners by the unit owner's 7    association.8        (8) A statement that any improvements or alterations 9    made to the unit, or the limited common elements assigned 10    thereto, by the prior unit owner are in good faith 11    believed to be in compliance with the condominium 12    instruments. 13        (9) The identity and mailing address of the principal 14    officer of the unit owner's association or of the other 15    officer or agent as is specifically designated to receive 16    notices.17        (10) A copy of the most recent reserve study, if any. 18    (b) The principal officer of the unit owner's association 19or such other officer as is specifically designated shall 20furnish the above information when requested to do so in 21writing and within 10 business days of the request.22    (c) Within 15 days of the recording of a mortgage or trust 23deed against a unit ownership given by the owner of that unit 24to secure a debt, the owner shall inform the Board of Managers 25of the unit owner's association of the identity of the lender 26together with a mailing address at which the lender can   HB2563 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09919 JRC 19989 b1receive notices from the association. If a unit owner fails or 2refuses to inform the Board as required under subsection (c) 3then that unit owner shall be liable to the association for all 4costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees and such other 5damages, if any, incurred by the association as a result of 6such failure or refusal.7    A reasonable fee, not to exceed $375, covering the direct 8out-of-pocket cost of providing such information and copying 9may be charged by the association or its Board of Managers to 10the unit seller for providing such information. Beginning one 11year after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12102nd General Assembly, the $375 fee shall be increased or 13decreased, as applicable, by a percentage equal to the 14percentage change in the consumer price index-u during the 15preceding 12-month calendar year. "Consumer price index-u" 16means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 17the United States Department of Labor that measures the 18average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 19all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 201982-84 = 100. An association may charge an additional $100 21for rush service completed within 72 hours.22(Source: P.A. 102-976, eff. 1-1-23.)